Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-211
Attorney General; antitrust division; violations of federal antitrust laws; duties.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to institute and prosecute such proceedings as may be necessary for the State of Nebraska and its political subdivisions when there are violations of state and federal antitrust laws. Such proceedings shall be for the state and its political subdivisions as their interest may appear, and may be prosecuted in the name of the State of Nebraska. No later than June 30, 1974, the Attorney General shall establish within the Department of Justice an antitrust division to which he shall assign one or more assistants, as the work may require. It shall be the primary duty of such division to enforce the laws against monopolies, illegal trusts and other unlawful combinations in restraint of trade, and it shall investigate complaints of violations of such laws, subject to the availability of appropriations for that purpose. To assist the division, the Attorney General shall have authority to call on all agencies of this state, and the political subdivisions thereof, for such assistance as they may be in a position to provide, including but not limited to the furnishing of records and information relating to transactions entered into by them which the Attorney General believes pertain to his antitrust investigations.

Laws 1969, c. 826, § 1, p. 3133;

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 4.

Antitrust actions, see section 59-829.